Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 3

Political Parties

Cross References.

Filing for ballot position, §7-7-304.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1995, No. 901, § 21: Apr. 4, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state should provide for a state supported political primary system; and that this act should become effective immediately for the proper administration of this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

7-3-101. Duties and powers.

(a)

Subject to the provisions of this act and other applicable laws of this state, organized political parties shall:

(1)

Prescribe the qualifications of their own membership;

(2)

Prescribe the qualifications for voting in their party primaries; and

(3)

Establish rules and procedures for their own organization.

(b)(1)

An organized political party shall provide current copies of its adopted rules and procedures to the Secretary of State and the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(2)

The obligation under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is a continuing obligation, and as rules and procedures are amended the political party shall continue to provide updated and current copies of the rules and procedures.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 2; 1971, No. 261, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-102; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 1; 2019, No. 648, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added the (a) designation; substituted “Prescribe” for “Have the right to prescribe” in (a)(1); and added (b).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1969, No. 465, codified as §§7-1-101,7-1-103 —7-1-105,7-3-101 —7-3-108,7-4-101 —7-4-105,7-4-107 —7-4-112,7-5-101,7-5-102,
7-5-103 [repealed],7-5-202 —7-5-209,7-5-210 [repealed],7-5-211,7-5-301,7-5-302 [repealed],7-5-303 [repealed],7-5-304 —7-5-306,7-5-307 [repealed],7-5-308,7-5-309,7-5-312,7-5-313 [repealed],7-5-314 —7-5-319,7-5-401,7-5-402,7-5-405 —7-5-417,7-5-501 [repealed],7-5-502 —7-5-504,7-5-505 [repealed],7-5-506 [repealed],7-5-507,7-5-508 [repealed],7-5-509,7-5-511 [repealed],7-5-512,7-5-513,7-5-514 [repealed],7-5-515 —7-5-518,7-5-519 [repealed],7-5-520 —7-5-522,7-5-524 —7-5-531,7-5-701 —7-5-706,7-5-801 —7-5-809,7-6-101 —7-6-105,7-7-101 —7-7-105,7-7-201 —7-7-203,7-7-301 —7-7-307,7-7-309,7-7-310 [repealed],7-7-401,7-7-402,7-7-403 [repealed],7-8-101 —7-8-104,7-8-301,7-8-302,7-8-304 —7-8-307,25-16-801.

Acts 1995, No. 901, codified as §§7-3-101,7-7-201 —7-7-203,7-7-301 —7-7-306,7-7-308,7-7-309,7-7-310 [repealed],7-7-311 [repealed],7-7-312 [repealed],7-7-401.

7-3-102. National committee members.

The national committeeman and national committeewoman of political parties of this state shall be selected in the manner provided in the party rules of the respective political parties in this state.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-102.

7-3-103. State committee members.

(a)

The members of the state committee of political parties in this state shall be elected in accordance with respective political party rules.

(b)

The term of office of the members of a state committee shall begin from their election, and they shall hold office until their successors are elected and qualified as provided under respective political party rules.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 2; 1971, No. 261, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-102; Acts 2019, No. 648, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “in accordance with respective political party rules” for “by the respective state conventions” in (a); deleted (b), and redesignated former (c) as (b); and substituted “until their successors are elected and qualified as provided under respective political party rules” for “until the next convention and until their successors are elected and qualified” in (b).

7-3-104. County committee members.

(a)(1)

The members of the county committee of political parties from each election precinct, township, or city ward shall be elected in accordance with respective political party rules.

(2)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section, the county board of election commissioners shall place on the ballot of the primary election the names of all persons seeking election as members of the county committee who have filed a written pledge to abide by the results of the primary, if any is required by the rules of the political party, and who have paid the filing fee, if any, assessed therefor.

(B)

When only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular position on the county committee, the candidate's name shall be omitted from the ballot and the candidate shall be selected to serve in the particular position in the same manner as if the position had been voted upon at the primary election.

(3)

If candidates for any county committee membership positions have not qualified as provided in this section within the time required for candidates to qualify, the county committee shall select candidates for committee members at any public meeting of the county committee held after the ticket has closed and prior to the time the primary election ballots are printed.

(4)

Vacancies in the county committee shall be filled by the county committee.

(b)(1)

Each person elected or appointed the county chair of the county committee of a political party shall notify the state chair of the respective party in writing within ten (10) days after his or her election or appointment.

(2)(A)

It shall be the duty of the state party chair to keep on file with the Secretary of State a complete list of the county chairs and to notify promptly the Secretary of State of any death, resignation, disqualification, or vacancy in the office of any county chair and of the election of a new chair to fill vacancies thus created.

(B)

Upon receipt of that information, the Secretary of State shall record the information, which shall be a public record.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-103; Acts 1997, No. 444, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 1; 2007, No. 222, § 2; 2019, No. 648, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted (c) relating to election officials.

The 2019 amendment substituted “in accordance with respective political party rules” for “by a majority vote of those votes cast for each membership position at the primary elections held by the political party” in (a)(1).

7-3-105. County convention delegates — Selection — Vacancy.

(a)

Delegates to the county convention shall be elected in accordance with respective political party rules.

(b)

The county committee may place on the ballot of the primary election the names of all persons seeking election as a county convention delegate who shall have filed a written pledge to abide by the results of the primary, if any is required by the rules of the political party, and shall have paid the ballot fee, if any, assessed therefor.

(c)

If candidates for county convention delegates have not qualified as herein provided within the time required for candidates to qualify, the county committee shall select candidates or delegates to the county convention at any public meeting of the committee held after the ticket has closed and prior to the time the primary election ballots are printed.

(d)

Any vacancies existing or occurring in any of the positions of delegates after the primary election or elections have been held may be filled by the county committee.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-104; Acts 2019, No. 648, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “to the county convention shall be elected in accordance with respective political party rules” for “from each election precinct, township, or city ward to the county convention of political parties shall be selected at the primary election held by each party” in (a); and substituted “may place” for “shall place” in (b).

7-3-106. County convention — Primary election results — Selection of state and national delegates — Vacancies.

(a)

Each political party holding a primary election shall at the time required in §7-7-203(f) hold a county convention composed of delegates elected at the primary election in each township and ward.

(b)(1)

The county convention shall receive from the county board of election commissioners a list of all nominated candidates for county, township, and municipal offices and the political party's county committee members and delegates and select delegates and alternates to all conventions held by the political party.

(2)

However, the state committee of the political party may make rules for the election of delegates to the national convention of the political party, and the delegates may be elected before the primary elections.

(c)(1)

Vacancies in the delegation to a convention arising from death, absence, resignation, or ineligibility shall be filled by the alternates in the order of their selection.

(2)

In the absence of alternates, vacancies shall be filled by the remaining members of the delegation.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-104; Acts 1997, No. 444, § 2.

7-3-107. State convention — Declaration of election results and nominees — Certificates.

After a primary election for the selection of nominees for United States, state, or district offices, each political party shall hold a state convention following the biennial general primary election for the purpose of:

(1)

Receiving from the Secretary of State the certification of the election results for all United States, state, and district offices. Each party shall furnish to each successful nominee a certificate of nomination; and

(2)

Performing other duties as may be required by party rules or by law.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 2; 1971, No. 261, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-102; Acts 1997, No. 444, § 3.

7-3-108. Subversive parties — New parties — Affidavit required — Penalty.

(a)

A political party shall not be recognized, qualified to participate, or permitted to have the names of its candidates printed on the ballot in any election in this state that:

(1)

Either directly or indirectly advocates, teaches, justifies, aids, or abets the overthrow by force or violence, or by any unlawful means, of the government of the United States or this state, or an act of terrorism as described by §5-54-205; or

(2)

Directly or indirectly carries on, advocates, teaches, justifies, aids, or abets a program of sabotage, force and violence, sedition, or treason against the government of the United States or this state.

(b)(1)

A newly organized political party shall not be recognized, qualified to participate, or permitted to have the names of its candidates printed on the ballot in any election in this state until it has filed an affidavit, by the officers of the party in this state under oath, that:

(A)

It does not either directly or indirectly advocate, teach, justify, aid, or abet the overthrow by force or violence or by any unlawful means of the government of the United States or this state, or an act of terrorism as described by §5-54-205; or

(B)

It does not directly or indirectly carry on, advocate, teach, justify, aid, or abet a program of sabotage, force and violence, sedition, or treason against the government of the United States or this state.

(2)

The affidavit shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(c)

Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 11, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1107; Acts 1997, No. 444, § 4; 2001, No. 1553, § 18; 2005, No. 1994, § 484; 2013, No. 1126, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a) and (b)(1), substituted “A” for “No” and inserted “not”; and substituted “described” for “defined” in (a)(1) and (b)(1)(A).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §7-3-101.